West Virginia, session 2026, HB4222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-59-1 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (diabetes self-management education, 64 CSR 115), is authorized.